test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-AN-sikak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sikâk - ok : # -k final animate noun 'goose'
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg: sikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl: sikâkwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Loc: sikâkonâhk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [sikâkos, sikâkosis]
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [sikâkosak, sikâkosisak]

     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâkom
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâkom
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkoma
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâkominân
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâkominaw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkomiwâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa

     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkomak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkomak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkoma
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkominânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâkominawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkomiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osikâkomiyiwa

     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisikâkomis
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisikâkomis
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkomisa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osikâkomisiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisikâkomisinân
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisikâkomisinaw
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisikâkomisiwâw
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomisiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osikâkomisiyiwa
 
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisikâkomisak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisikâkomisak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osikâkomisa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osikâkomisiyiwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisikâkomisinânak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisikâkomisinawak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisikâkomisiwâwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osikâkomisiwâwa
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osikâkomisiyiwa
     
